Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2049.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 30, chapter 4, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 30-682, to read: START_STATUTE30-682. Rural counties; critical access hospitals; use of particle accelerator for the treatment of human disease; general supervision; definitions A. In a county with a population of less than four hundred thousand persons or for a registrant that meets the requirements for designation as a critical access hospital as prescribed in 42 Code of Federal Regulations part 485, subpart F, the department shall allow the use of a particle accelerator to treat human diseases under general supervision if the registrant ensures all of the following: 1. The registrant or an authorized user: (a) Has established a written protocol for the application of radiation to a patient for each procedure that may be conducted by a radiation therapy technologist under the general supervision of an authorized user, including follow-up instructions for the patient. (b) Reviews and, as necessary, revises the written protocol at least annually. (c) Documents the review required by subdivision (b) of this paragraph with a signature and date of signature. 2. Any procedure conducted pursuant to this subsection is not a special procedure. 3. A radiation therapy technologist follows the applicable written protocol when delivering radiation to a patient. 4. At least every six months an authorized user: (a) Observes each radiation therapy technologist while the radiation therapy technologist is performing a procedure to ensure the radiation therapy technologist's adherence to the applicable written protocol. (b) Documents the authorized user's observation and assessment of the radiation therapy technologist. 5. An authorized user is on-site and available for consultation about patient care at least once every five working days, as verified in documentation maintained by the registrant. 6. The health and safety of a patient are maintained. B. A registrant that uses general supervision to comply with the requirements of this section shall develop, maintain and implement policies and procedures to monitor both: 1. The performance of each procedure by a radiation therapy technologist under general supervision. 2. The quality of patient care. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Authorized user" means an authorized user as defined in rule by the department. 2. "General supervision" means that a radiation therapy technologist is furnished with a written protocol for performing procedures under an authorized user's overall direction and control and that the authorized user is responsible for ensuring that the protocol for the procedure is followed but is not required to be present in the health care institution during the performance of the procedure. 3. "Radiation therapy technologist" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-2801. 4. "Registrant" means a registrant as defined in rule by the department. 5. "Special procedure" means a type of therapy through which radiation is delivered to a patient through five or fewer fractions or with a dose per fraction greater than six Gy.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.